Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5993.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1202a. (1) An insurance agency or producer may impose or pass along a fee for any insured making payment by credit card, debit card, electronic funds transfer, electronic check, or other electronic means to offset actual costs incurred by the insurance producer for accepting and processing payments made by electronic means subject to the following: (a) Any fee collected by an insurance agency or producer under this subsection must not exceed the actual costs incurred by the insurance agency or producer. However, an insurance producer may impose a fee instead of the actual cost of the individual payment type that does not exceed the average of the actual cost incurred for the various types of electronic payments for which the insurance producer imposes a fee. (b) An insurance agency or producer charging, collecting, or passing through a fee under this subsection shall notify the insured of the amount of the fee before completing a transaction, provide an opportunity for the insured to cancel the transaction without incurring a fee, and make available the option to make a payment by check or money order without the imposition of a fee for a card payment or electronic payment. (c) If an insured elects to make a payment to the insurance agency or producer by credit card, debit card, electronic funds transfer, electronic check, or other electronic means and a fee is imposed and collected under this subsection, the payment of the fee must not be refundable. (d) The fee may be charged in addition to all other interest and fees allowed by law. (e) An insurance agency or producer shall not charge a fee on any debit card or prepaid card transaction if the payment card network on which the transaction is initiated or processed prohibits the fee by contract, rule, or policy. (2) As used in this section, "actual costs" means actual third-party costs incurred or charged for the processing of payments made by electronic means. If an insurance agency or producer is an affiliate of an entity that processes payments made by electronic means, the payment processing affiliate is considered a third party. Sec. 1915. (1) A licensee may charge a fee as follows: (a) For a surplus lines insurance policy, a A fee in addition to a commission only if the fee is not included in the premium and the fee is reasonable to cover underwriting and other expenses that are unique to surplus lines . (b) For a personal lines insurance policy, a fee not to exceed the greater of $100.00 or 10% of the personal lines insurance policy premium. (b) If the insured pays the premium with a credit card, the credit card transaction fee. (2) All of the following apply to a fee charged under subsection (1): (a) The fee must not be excessive or discriminatory. The licensee shall maintain complete documentation of all fees charged and evidence of the disclosure required under subdivision (b). (b) The fee must be fully disclosed in detail to the insured, whether directly or through another licensed insurance producer, in writing before the sale. The fee must be separately itemized on any of the following: (i) The policy declarations page. (ii) The billing statement. (iii) Other documentation provided to the purchaser setting forth the cost of the policy. (c) The fee must not be included as a part of the policy premium in the computation of premium taxes.